North Carolina, session 2025, HB1221.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Charter of the Town of Everetts, being Chapter 321 of the Private
Laws of 1893, as amended by Chapter 82 of the 1979 Session Laws, is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"Sec. 3.1. The officers of the Town of Everetts shall consist of one mayor and a board of
commissioners. The board of commissioners of the Town of Everetts shall consist of three
members. Elections in the Town of Everetts shall be conducted under the nonpartisan plurality
method and the results determined as provided in G.S. 163-292. The Town of Everetts shall elect,
for four-year terms, three members of the board of commissioners and a mayor every four years."
SECTION 2. Beginning in 2027, elections for the mayor and members of the board
of commissioners shall be for four-year terms and shall take place every four years.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*H1221-v-1*